nl: Certificeringsnorm racehelm: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Overig
fr: Norme de certification des casques de course: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Autre
bg-BG: Стандарт за сертификация на състезателна каска: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Друго
zh-TW: 賽車安全帽認證標準: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; 其他
hr-HR: Standard certificiranja motociklističke kacige: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Ostalo
pt-PT: Norma de certificação dos capacetes de corrida: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Outra
ro-RO: Standard de certificare pentru căști de curse: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Altele
de: Zertifizierungsstandard der Rennhelme: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Sonstige
ko: 레이싱 헬멧 인증 표준: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT(FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; 기타
tr: Yarış kaskı sertifikasyon standardı: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Diğer
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận của mũ bảo hiểm đua xe: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Khác
hu: Versenybukósisak tanúsítási szabványa: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Egyéb
nb: Sertifiseringsstandard for racinghjelm: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Annet
zh-CN: 赛车头盔认证标准: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; 其他
ja: レースヘルメット認証標準: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; その他
es: Estándar de certificación de cascos de carreras: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Otra
ru: Стандарт сертификации гоночного шлема: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Другое
fi: Kilpakypärän sertifiointistandardi: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Muu
lt-LT: Lenktynių šalmų sertifikavimo standartas: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Kita
el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης αγωνιστικού κράνους: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Άλλο
pl: Norma certyfikacji kasku wyścigowego: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Inne
sk-SK: Norma na certifikáciu pretekárskej helmy: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Iné
sv: Certifieringsstandard för racinghjälm: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Övrigt
sl-SI: Certifikacijski standard za dirkaško čelado: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Drugo
da: Certificeringsstandard for racerhjelm: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Andet
pt-BR: Capacete de competição, norma de homologação: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Outra
it: Standard di certificazione del casco da corsa: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Altro
th: มาตรฐานการรับรองหมวกกันน็อคสำหรับการแข่งขัน: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; อื่นๆ
en: Racing helmet certification standard: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Other
cs: Certifikační standard závodní přilby: AS/NZS 1698; BSI; CSA; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8860-2010; FIA 8860-2018; FIM; JIS T 8133; SFI 24.1; SFI 31.1; SFI 31.2A; Snell SA2010; Snell SA2015; Snell SA2020; Jiné